Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.110

Voting.

The right of a class or classes of members or shareholders to vote may be limited, enlarged or denied to the extent specified in the articles of incorporation. Unless so limited, enlarged or denied, each member and each outstanding share of each class shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members or shareholders. No member of a class may acquire any interest which will entitle him or her to a greater vote than any other member of the same class.

A member or shareholder may vote in person or, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws otherwise provide, may vote by mail, by electronic transmission, or by proxy executed in writing by the member or shareholder or by his or her duly authorized attorney-in-fact: PROVIDED, That no proxy shall be valid for more than eleven months from the date of its execution unless otherwise specified in the proxy.

If a member or shareholder may vote by proxy, the proxy may be given by:

(1) Executing a writing authorizing another person or persons to act for the member or shareholder as proxy. Execution may be accomplished by the member or shareholder or the member's or shareholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent signing the writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to the writing by any reasonable means including, but not limited to, facsimile signature; or

(2) Authorizing another person or persons to act for the member or shareholder as proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of an electronic transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy, or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization, or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the transmission. If it is determined that the electronic transmissions are valid, the inspector of election or, if there are no inspectors, any other officer or agent of the corporation making that determination on behalf of the corporation shall specify the information upon which they relied. The corporation shall require the holders of proxies received by electronic transmission to provide to the corporation copies of the electronic transmission and the corporation shall retain copies of the electronic transmission for a reasonable period of time.

If specifically permitted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, whenever proposals or directors or officers are to be voted upon, such vote may be taken by mail or by electronic transmission if the name of each candidate and the text of each proposal to be so voted upon are set forth in a writing accompanying or contained in the notice of meeting. Persons voting by mail or by electronic transmission shall be deemed present for all purposes of quorum, count of votes and percentages of total voting power voting.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in all elections for directors every person entitled to vote shall have the right to cumulate his or her vote and to give one candidate a number of votes equal to his or her vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected, or by distributing such votes on the same principle among any number of such candidates.

[ 2001 c 271 s 6; 2000 c 167 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 22.]